Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
SEXUAL OFFENSES

Law Journals and Reviews

Rape and Child Sexual Assault: Dispelling the Myths. 14 UH
L. Rev. 157 (1992).

§§707-730 to 707-738 [OLD] REPEALED. L
1986, c 314, §56.

§707-730 Sexual assault in the first
degree. (1) A person commits the offense of sexual assault in the first
degree if:

(a) The person knowingly subjects another person to
an act of sexual penetration by strong compulsion;

(b) The person knowingly engages in sexual
penetration with another person who is less than fourteen years old;

(c) The person knowingly engages in sexual
penetration with a person who is at least fourteen years old but less than
sixteen years old; provided that:

(i) The person is not less than five years
older than the minor; and

(ii) The person is not legally married to the
minor;

(d) The person knowingly subjects to sexual
penetration another person who is mentally defective; or

(e) The person knowingly subjects to sexual
penetration another person who is mentally incapacitated or physically helpless
as a result of the influence of a substance that the actor knowingly caused to
be administered to the other person without the other person's consent.

Paragraphs (b) and (c) shall not be construed to
prohibit practitioners licensed under chapter 453 or 455 from performing any
act within their respective practices.

(2) Sexual assault in the first degree is a
class A felony. [L 1986, c 314, pt of §57; am L 1987, c 181, §9; am L Sp 2001
2d, c 1, §§1, 7; am L 2002, c 36, §3; am L 2003, c 62, §1; am L 2004, c 10, §15;
am L 2006, c 230, §32; am L 2009, c 11, §72]

Cross References

Testing of charged or convicted person for human
immunodeficiency virus status, see §325-16.5.

Case Notes

Defendant's right to a fair trial was violated where
counselor of victim-witness was allowed to place hands upon victim's shoulders
while victim was testifying. 70 H. 472, 777 P.2d 240 (1989).

Trial court did not commit plain error when it gave a single
instruction encompassing two counts of sexual assault in first degree; a
consent instruction may be given separately and need not be included as an
element of sexual assault. 75 H. 152, 857 P.2d 579 (1993).

Sexual assault in the first degree, in violation of
subsection (1)(b), is not, and cannot be, a "continuing offense";
each distinct act in violation of this statute constitutes a separate offense
under the Hawaii Penal Code. 84 H. 1, 928 P.2d 843 (1996).

As a precondition to convicting a person of first degree
sexual assault, in violation of subsection (1)(b), the prosecution must prove
beyond a reasonable doubt that the person committed an act of "any
penetration, however slight", as mandated by the plain language of the
definition of "sexual penetration" contained in §707-700. 102 H.
391, 76 P.3d 943 (2003).

A specific unanimity (jury) instruction is not required where
(1) the offense is not defined in such a manner as to preclude it from being
proved as a continuous offense and (2) the prosecution alleges, adduces
evidence of, and argues that the defendant's action constituted a continuous
course of conduct; thus, a specific unanimity instruction was not required
where prosecution alleged a continuous course of conduct with respect to
defendant's kidnapping charge under §707-720, but was required for defendant's
attempted first degree sexual assault charge under this section. 121 H. 339,
219 P.3d 1126 (2009).

Circuit court did not err in instructing the jury on the
lesser included offense of sexual assault in the third degree where, although testimony
indicated that there were incidents of sexual penetration between complainant
and defendant, which would support a conviction for sexual assault in the first
degree, a rational juror could have inferred that there was "sexual
contact" prior to the penetration, i.e., that there was "touching"
of "the sexual or other intimate parts" of complainant, such as
complainant's genitalia, buttocks, or other intimate parts, or that complainant
touched defendant's "sexual or other intimate parts". 124 H. 90, 237
P.3d 1156 (2010).

There was overwhelming evidence tending to show defendant
guilty beyond a reasonable doubt of two counts of sexual assault in the first
degree, where defendant subjected victim to acts of sexual penetration by
inserting defendant's penis into victim's mouth and genital openings,
respectively, by strong compulsion, and did so knowingly as to each element of
the offense. 126 H. 267, 270 P.3d 997 (2011).

Where victim testified that defendant sexually assaulted
victim in each of the four ways alleged, which was supported by testimony of
victim's brother and uncle, evidence was sufficient to prove that defendant
intentionally engaged in conduct under the circumstances that defendant
believed them to be, the conduct constituted a substantial step in the course
of conduct, and defendant intended that the course of conduct culminate in
sexual penetration with victim, thus supporting defendant's convictions. 126
H. 383, 271 P.3d 1142 (2012).

Trial court must instruct jury as to what specific facts jury
must find before it decides whether defendant is guilty of attempted sexual
assault in first degree. 77 H. 177 (App.), 880 P.2d 1224 (1994).

Placement of the elemental attendant circumstances after the
state of mind in the enumerated elements instruction was not error; when read
and considered as a whole, the instructions adequately informed the jury of the
prosecution's burden to prove that complainant did not consent to the acts
alleged and was not married to defendant at the time, and that defendant was
aware of both circumstances when defendant acted. 97 H. 140 (App.), 34 P.3d
1039 (2000).

Where there was no evidence, independent of defendant's
extrajudicial confession, of the corpus delicti of attempted sexual assault of
victim by defendant, defendant's conviction reversed. 103 H. 490 (App.), 83
P.3d 753 (2003).

Although criminal sanctions are clearly directed only at
adult conduct under subsection (1)(b) and §707-732(1)(b), there is no
legislative history that supports a conclusion that only adults were intended
to be prohibited from the proscribed sexual conduct; when the legislature
amended subsection (1) and §707-732(1) in 2001, and could have, but did not
include language allowing consensual sexual conduct between, for example, two
thirteen year olds, the legislative intent was to maintain the existing
prohibitions against such conduct. 121 H. 92 (App.), 214 P.3d 1082 (2009).

Section 707-732(1)(b) and subsection (1)(b), as applied to
private consensual acts between two persons, including minors, did not violate
minor's right to privacy as the State has at least a significant interest in
regulating the sexual activities of children under the age of fourteen; in
addition, there is no fundamental personal privacy right for minors under the
age of fourteen to engage in sexual activities with other children under the
age of fourteen; this applies to young boys, as well as to young girls, and is
not strictly dependent on an age differential between the children. 121 H. 92
(App.), 214 P.3d 1082 (2009).

State's exercise of prosecutorial discretion in the case was
not constitutionally infirm where defendant failed to meet the burden of
demonstrating that defendant was prosecuted based on an arbitrary
classification; defendant was prosecuted under §707-732 and this section based
on allegations that defendant was significantly older than child #1, had
initiated the prohibited sexual activities with child #1 and child #2, and had
engaged in multiple instances of prohibited sexual contact with more than one
child. 121 H. 92 (App.), 214 P.3d 1082 (2009).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next